Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Rates; Service.
§ 77-3-39.
Hearing on rate change; suspension of proposed rates.

Whenever there is filed with the commission by any public utility any notice of intent to change rates pursuant to the provisions of Section 77-3-37, the commission, if it so orders within thirty (30) days after the date such notice of intent is filed, shall hold a hearing to determine the reasonableness and lawfulness of such rate change. The commission shall hold such hearing in every case in which the change in rates constitutes a major change in rates, as defined in Section 77-3-37(8). An abbreviated proceeding may satisfy this requirement if the commission’s order is supported by the data, documentation and exhibits on file in the proceeding.

Pending such hearing and the decision thereon, the commission may, at any time before they become effective, suspend the operation of such rate or rates, but not for a period longer than one hundred twenty (120) days beyond the date of the filing of the notice of intent, except as provided in subsections (15) and (16) of this section.

Prior to the hearing specifically provided for herein, the commission shall direct all parties of record to appear before a hearing examiner or member of the commission staff designated by it, for a prehearing conference.

Such prehearing conference shall be held at least twenty (20) days before the date such rate case is set for hearing. The commission shall establish a procedure for conducting such prehearing conference, which procedure shall include: (a) setting forth issues upon which no evidence shall be taken, except upon offer of proof; (b) designation of specific issues upon which evidence will be taken; and (c) specific areas of agreement to be placed on the record, together with the original position of the utility, the public utilities staff and the interested parties of record.

At such prehearing conference the commission, or its designee, and the parties shall consider: (a) the simplification of the issues; (b) the necessity or desirability of providing additional information to the commission; (c) the possibility of obtaining admissions or stipulations that will avoid unnecessary proof; and (d) such other matters as may aid in the disposition of the case.

The commission may accept and adopt as its own, the agreements between any or all interested parties of record, or any portion thereof, resulting from the prehearing conference and allow such changes in rates, without requiring any further proceedings, to become effective immediately.

The commission may enter its order reciting the action taken at the prehearing conference, the agreements made by the parties as to any matters considered and the limitation of the issues for hearing to those not disposed of by admissions or stipulations of counsel. If practicable, such order shall specify the facts that appear without substantial controversy, including the extent to which the rate change is not in controversy, and shall also direct such further proceedings in the case as are just.

After the prehearing conference and no later than ten (10) days prior to the date set by the commission for a hearing:

The public utilities staff shall submit to the commission all final exhibits, prepared testimony and evidence, and shall serve copies on all interested parties of record, which documents shall reflect the agreements made at the prehearing conference;

The utility shall provide an exhibit indicating which portion, if any, of the public utilities staff’s presentation and that of other parties it is prepared to accept and be free of future litigation, showing thereon the effect of such acceptance on the applicant’s request for such changes, and shall serve copies on all parties of record;

Parties other than the public utilities staff and the utility shall submit their amended exhibits, prepared direct testimony and evidence, reflecting the agreements made at the prehearing conference, and shall serve copies on all parties of record.

If, after such hearing or abbreviated proceeding, the commission shall find any such rate or rates to be unjust, unreasonable or unreasonably discriminatory, or in anywise in violation of the law, the same shall be set aside, and the commission shall determine and fix by order such rate or rates as will yield a fair rate of return to the public utility for furnishing service to the public and shall make and file its conclusions and findings of facts supporting such order. A copy of such order shall be served upon the utility in the manner provided in this chapter, and the rates fixed by the commission shall be the legal rates until changed as prescribed by this chapter.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter, the commission shall hold the hearing, render its decision and enter its order not more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of the filing of the said notice of intent. If the commission does not make a final determination concerning any schedule of rates within a period of one hundred twenty 120) days after the date of the filing of the notice of intent, and notwithstanding any order of suspension, except as provided in subsections (15) and (16) of this section, the public utility may put such suspended rate or rates into effect as temporary rates by filing with the commission a bond in a reasonable amount approved by the commission, with sureties approved by the commission, conditioned upon the refund, in a manner and to the parties to be prescribed by order of the commission, of the amount of the excess, with lawful interest thereon, if the rate or rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive. There may be substituted for such bond other arrangements satisfactory to the commission for the protection of the parties interested. During any such period when suspended rates are in effect under bond or other arrangement the commission may, in its discretion, require that the public utility involved shall keep an accurate account of payments made under the rate or rates which the public utility has put into operation in excess of the rate or rates in effect immediately prior thereto.

In addition to the other remedies provided by law, should there be an appeal of the commission’s final order, the commission shall allow the utility to place such portion of the schedule of rates that is approved by the commission in such final order into effect under refunding bond or other arrangements satisfactory to the commission for the protection of parties interested.

Should the final judicial determination of an appeal of a commission’s final order rendered pursuant to subsection (9) hereof result in a schedule of rates less than what the commission allowed, the commission shall by order require the refund to customers of any amounts collected by a utility under bond, or other arrangements, during the appellate process which the courts found to be in excess of the amounts that should have been allowed by the commission in its final order. Such refunds shall be made in full, including interest at the lawful rate and shall be made within ninety (90) days after such final judicial determination. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this subsection if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

Any bond, or other arrangements, approved by the commission pursuant to subsection (11) of this section shall be in such amount and with sufficient sureties to insure the prompt payment of any refunds if the rates so put into effect are finally determined by the commission or the courts to be excessive.

For purposes of subsections (9), (11) and (12) of this section, the term “final order” means an order of the commission promulgated pursuant to subsection (9) of this section or, in the event of a rehearing conducted pursuant to Section 77-3-65, means an order of the commission promulgated subsequent to such rehearing.

No public utility may have more than one (1) major change in rates in effect under refunding bond at the same time. When a case is pending before the commission or before any court which involves a major change in rates which are in effect under refunding bond, and when the commission shall find that the pending case involves an issue or issues necessary to be resolved before the commission can effectively proceed with the hearing, decision or order, the 120-day period provided for in subsections (2) and (10) of this section may be enlarged by the commission, in order to postpone the hearing on the notice of intent, decision or final order in any subsequent rate case filed by the same utility, until a final order has been rendered with respect to the prior pending change in rates.

When a notice of intent to change rates is filed with the commission, said notice shall be assigned a docket number and the commission shall examine the filing to determine if it contains the standard requirement list of documentation set out in Section 77-3-37(2) and (4), if applicable, and in any rules and regulations adopted by the commission under Section 77-3-37(2). Within five (5) days from the date said notice is filed, the commission shall notify the filing utility in writing of its failure to include with its notice any items included in such standard requirement list of documentation. Such notification shall specify the item or items not filed with said notice. The filing utility shall have ten (10) days from the date it receives said notification to file the omitted item or items with the commission. Provided, however, upon request by the filing utility made within said ten-day period, the commission shall grant, by order, such additional time as the filing utility may request, not to exceed thirty (30) additional days, within which to file the omitted item or items. If the filing utility fails to file the omitted item or items within said ten (10) days or within such extended period of time as the commission by order shall allow, the commission may refuse to consider any evidence in support of said item or items in making the commission’s final determination concerning the schedule of rates filed with the notice. Notwithstanding the 120-day time period imposed on the commission to render its decision and enter its order under subsections (2) and (10) of this section and the 80-day time period imposed on the public utilities staff, intervenors or protestants for the filing of all direct testimony, exhibits and other information under Section 77-3-37(7)(b), if the filing utility is granted additional time within which to file the omitted item or items, said 120-day and the 80-day time periods shall be extended by the number of days between the date of the commission’s order granting the extension and the date such omitted items are filed with the commission, but such extension of said 120-day and 80-day time periods shall not exceed thirty (30) days.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-10; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 10; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 16; Laws, 1985, ch. 302, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 310, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1992).

§ 77-3-40.
Hearing examiners; powers and duties; reports, recommended decisions and orders of examiners; procedures.

The commission is authorized and empowered to employ not more than three (3) hearing examiners to whom the commission may refer such matters as the commission may deem advisable in order to expedite the work of the commission.

The commission may refer any matter requiring a hearing to a hearing examiner for hearing, report and recommendation of an appropriate order or decision thereon by the commission. Subject to the limitations prescribed in this chapter, a hearing examiner to whom a hearing has been referred by order of the commission shall have all the rights, duties, powers and jurisdiction conferred by this chapter upon the commission. The commission may direct any hearing by the hearing examiner to be held in such place or places within the state as may be determined to be in the public interest and as will best serve the convenience of interested parties. Before any hearing examiner enters upon the performance of duties as an examiner, he shall first take, subscribe to and file with the commission an oath similar to the oath required of members of the commission.

In all cases in which a pending proceeding shall be assigned to a hearing examiner, such examiner shall hear and determine the proceedings and submit his recommended order, but, in the event of a petition to the commission to review such recommended order, the hearing examiner shall take no part in such review.

Any report, order or decision recommended by a hearing examiner with respect to any matter referred for hearing shall be in writing and shall set forth separately findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall be filed with the commission. A copy of such recommended order, report and findings shall be served upon the parties who have appeared in the proceeding.

Prior to any recommended decision or order of an examiner, the parties shall be afforded an opportunity to submit, within the time prescribed by order entered in the cause, unless further extended by order of the commission, for the consideration of the examiner, as the case may be, proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law and briefs or, in its discretion, oral arguments in lieu thereof.

Within the time prescribed by the examiner, the parties shall be afforded an opportunity to file exceptions to the recommended decision or order, provided the time so fixed shall be not less than fifteen (15) days from the date of such recommended decision or order. If exceptions are filed, a complete record of the proceedings before the hearing examiner shall be prepared and shall include the ruling upon each requested finding and conclusion or exception.

When no exceptions are filed within the time specified to a recommended decision or order, such recommended decision or order shall become the order of the commission and shall immediately become effective unless the order is stayed or postponed by the commission; provided, the commission may, on its own motion, review any such matter and take action thereon as if exceptions thereto had been filed.

When exceptions are filed, as herein provided, it shall be the duty of the commission to consider the same and, if sufficient reason appears therefor, to grant such review or make such order or hold or authorize such further hearing or proceeding as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission, after review, upon the whole record, or as supplemented by a further hearing, shall decide the matter in controversy and make appropriate order or decision thereon. Briefs and oral argument before the commission shall be permitted if requested by any party of record.

The commission may also refer such matters as the commission may deem advisable in order to expedite the work of the commission to any member of the commission for hearing, report and recommendation in accordance with the procedures provided in this section, except that the commission member hearing the matter may participate in any review of his recommended order by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 17; Laws, 1991, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1992).

§ 77-3-41.
Rates fixed by commission.

Whenever the commission, after hearing had on reasonable notice, finds that the existing rates in effect and collected by any public utility are unjust, unreasonable, materially excessive or insufficient or unreasonably discriminatory, or in anywise in violation of any provision of law, the commission shall determine, and fix by order, the just and reasonable rates which will yield a fair rate of return to the utility for furnishing service, which rates will thereafter be observed and in force. Said rates shall thereupon become the legal rates to be charged and paid until changed.

The commission shall have power, when deemed by it necessary to prevent injury to the business or interest of the people or any public utility of this state in case of any emergency, to permit any public utility to alter, amend or suspend temporarily any existing rates, schedules and orders relating to or affecting any public utility or part of any public utility in this state except as provided in Section 77-3-42.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-11; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 11; Laws, 1978, ch. 507, § 1(1), (2); Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 18; Laws, 1989, ch. 304, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1992).

§ 77-3-42.
Rate increase resulting from fuel adjustment clauses or riders; audits of fuel purchases.

No public utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, shall increase its rate or rate schedule in addition to its base rate as a result of what is commonly referred to as “fuel adjustment clauses” increase or “fuel adjustment riders” if the application of such clause or rider shall result in ultimate cost recovery exceeding the actual cost of fuel burned or consumed in its generating facilities and the cost of purchased energy.

For the purpose of such fuel adjustment clause or rider, the cost of fuel as used herein shall include only the actual cost of the fuel and its transportation and may include such other cost items which are as of the effective date of this section allowed by the federal energy regulatory commission for inclusion in wholesale fuel adjustment clauses under its jurisdiction. In addition thereto fuel cost may include direct costs associated with burning the fuel at the generating plant such as fuel handling expenses and the cost of fuel sampling and analysis.

The commission is hereby directed to cause a continuous monitoring by the public utilities staff and a complete audit, as necessary but not less than annually, of all fuel purchases for which fuel adjustment clauses or riders have been placed in effect prior to and after the effective date of this section, which shall totally verify fuel costs as might be consumed in generating plants and all purchased energy of such electric utilities in Mississippi with said audit being based upon generally accepted auditing standards which would accurately provide detailed information as to the actual monthly utility fuel costs. Such audit shall be completely independent of any audit performed on behalf of such utility.

The commission is hereby directed to promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the laws, (i) to define allowable costs for inclusion in fuel adjustments, (ii) to establish guidelines for defining what elements constitute a just and reasonable fuel adjustment clause or rider, (iii) to establish guidelines for defining what elements constitute efficient and economical procurement and use of energy and fuel, and (iv) to establish general guidelines for making the required review of fuel adjustment clauses or riders as required by this section. Such rules and regulations shall be spread upon the minutes of the commission.

Such audits shall include (i) a determination if fuel and associated costs are properly identified and recorded in the appropriate uniform system of accounts, (ii) a determination if purchased energy and associated costs are properly identified, (iii) an assessment of a utility’s practices for economical purchase and use of fuel and electric energy, and (iv) an assessment of the relevant contract terms and conditions and any variations from contract terms.

The audits required by this section shall extend to the fuel acquisition activities of any corporation which is owned in whole or in part by any such public utility under the jurisdiction of the commission or owned in whole or in part by a public utility holding company which is the parent company of any public utility under the jurisdiction of the commission. Public utilities under the jurisdiction of this commission, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, shall not purchase fuel and/or energy from a company or corporation which is owned in whole or in part by that public utility or by the parent company of that public utility unless the selling company or corporation assents to audits as provided for under this section.

Upon receipt of each audit report, the certified public accountant of the public utilities staff shall review the report and furnish the commissioners with a written summary of, and his comments on, the report. The commission shall meet within one (1) week after receipt of the accountant’s summary, and shall spread upon the minutes of the commission that it has reviewed said summary and further shall describe any action which it takes regarding the audit report or the fact that no action was required. Any costs included in a fuel adjustment clause or rider by a public utility under the jurisdiction of the commission found in violation of this section shall, by order of the commission, be refunded to the appropriate person or persons. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this subsection if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

Periodically, and not less frequently than annually, the commission shall review the audit reports, the reports of the certified public accountant of the public utilities staff, any reports of the public utilities staff relating to its monitoring of fuel purchases, and all other relevant information relating to fuel purchases, fuel adjustment clauses or riders, and purchased energy for the purpose of determining (a) whether or not the utility is properly and correctly employing the use of the fuel adjustment clause or rider applicable to its operations and billing procedures, (b) whether or not the utility has engaged in practices in the acquisition of fuel or purchased energy which are efficient and economical, and (c) whether or not there is reason to question the practices, contracts, operations or procedures of the utility in the purchase or acquisition of fuel or purchased energy relative to efficiency, economy and the public interest.

If the commission, after following the procedures described above, has reasonable cause to believe that inefficient or uneconomical procurement or use of fuel or purchased energy has resulted in unreasonable or unjust charges or costs to the consumers, then the commission shall initiate a procedure for hearing as provided for in Section 77-3-47 for the purpose of determining whether or not any of the costs or charges included in the fuel adjustment charges to the consumers were unreasonable or unjust. If the commission upon hearing shall find that any charges for the purchase or procurement of fuel or purchased energy were unreasonable or unjust, then the commission shall order that such costs or charges be refunded to the appropriate person or persons together with interest at the same rate prescribed in Section 77-3-39, Section 77-3-69 and Section 77-3-71. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this subsection if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

The commission shall maintain at all times complete and current data relating to sales and purchases of electric capacity of all utilities, including copies of contracts and agreements for the purchase of electric capacity, amendments to such contracts, records of purchases and sales of electric capacity, and all other relevant information and data deemed appropriate by the commission for carrying out the provisions of this section.

The commission is hereby directed to review, not less frequently than annually, the information and data described above. If, from said review the commission has reasonable cause to believe that inefficient or uneconomical sales or purchases of electric capacity by a utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation by the commission, have resulted in unreasonable or unjust charges or costs to the consumers, then the commission shall initiate a procedure for hearing as provided for in Section 77-3-47 for the purpose of determining whether or not any of the costs or charges for sales or purchases of electric capacity included in the charges to consumers were unreasonable or unjust. If the commission, upon hearing, shall find that any such charges for the sale or purchase of electric capacity were unreasonable or unjust, then the commission shall order that such costs or charges be refunded to the appropriate person or persons, together with interest thereon at the same rate prescribed in Section 77-3-39, Section 77-3-69 and Section 77-3-71. In lieu of payment, the utility may credit the service account with the amount due under this subsection if the consumer entitled to the refund is, at that time, a consumer of the utility.

The commission shall provide a full and complete report of said audits to the legislature on or before January 15 of each year. The report shall include certification by the commission that the information is true and correct as well as other clarifications of the audit information and any recommendations for correcting imperfections in statutes relative to existing fuel or purchased gas adjustments.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commission from entering an order in a declared emergency allowing public utilities under such emergency circumstances to adjust their rates for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days upon declaration of said emergency. There shall be a full hearing and a complete and total accounting as to total costs of said commission order to public utilities customers, with detailed accounting of such emergency fuel adjustment clause order being made available to the public.

This section shall not apply to a municipality, including a joint agency organized pursuant to Sections 77-5-701 et seq., as amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 507, § 1(3); Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-43.
Determination of rate base.

In regulating the rates of any public utility subject to the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall, on hearing after reasonable notice, ascertain and fix the rate base of the property of the public utility in such manner as to be fair both to the public utility and to the consumer when the same is relevant or material to the exercise of the jurisdiction of the commission. The commission shall make readjustments from time to time, and ascertain the cost of all new construction, extensions and additions to the property of every public utility. In arriving at such rate base, the commission shall give due consideration to: (a) the reasonable original costs of the property used and useful, or to be used and useful within a reasonable time after the test period; (b) the portion of the cost which has been consumed by previous use recovered by depreciation expense; (c) the allowance for funds used during construction, not to exceed on borrowed funds the true net interest cost of such funds, computed according to the actuarial method, and, on the equity component thereof, a rate of return granted on common equity in the last rate proceedings before the commission, or if such rate has not been established within the preceding three (3) years, then the average rate of return actually earned on equity during the preceding three (3) years; (d) any other elements deemed by the commission to be material in determining the rate base for rate-making purposes.

Valuations of property of such a public utility for rate-making purposes shall not include property purchased, labor supplied or services rendered by any firm or corporation owned or controlled in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by such public utility, or which owns or controls in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, such public utility, unless such firm or corporation permits the commission to have access to such of the books and records of such firm or corporation as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission to enable the commission to determine whether such labor, materials, property or services rendered were supplied at reasonable prices. The rate base shall not include property donated to such utility without any consideration nor shall operating expenses include depreciation of such donated property.

Whenever the commission is required in administering this chapter to find the value of gas in the field where produced, such value shall be determined as the amount paid therefor by the public utility in the field pursuant to arm’s length contract; and in the absence of such arm’s length contract, the fair market value of such gas as a commodity in the field.

The commission, in its discretion, when requested by petition of a rate-jurisdictional public utility providing water service as defined in Section 77-3-3(d) (iv), may allow to be recovered in rates the reasonable costs of used and useful facilities deemed necessary for fire protection. Such facilities include fire hydrants, transmission and distribution mains, storage facilities, pumping equipment or other facilities associated with the provision of adequate water production, storage and distribution for fire protection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-12; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 12; Laws, 1983; ch. 467, § 20; Laws, 2002, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 77-3-44.
Rate-regulated electric public utilities authorized to undertake economic development activities.

Any rate-regulated electric or natural gas public utility with certificated service area in Mississippi may undertake economic development activities, whether directly or indirectly, including activities such as providing capital, or investment in or acquisition and development of business or industrial sites and the necessary infrastructure or services needed to attract new or existing businesses or industry, to create or maintain employment opportunities, or otherwise to positively impact or in some manner promote the sale of electric energy or natural gas within its certificated service area. Any facilities developed, constructed or acquired in support of the activities described in this section for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity or other commission approval has been granted after July 1, 2015, as well as any capital investment in natural gas reserves made directly or indirectly by an electric or natural gas public utility to foster long-term stability in the cost of fuel, may be deemed used and useful in the provision of electric or natural gas service regardless of whether or not any end-use customers are taking service from said facilities or investment and otherwise recoverable through the utility’s rates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 360, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 322, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 10, 2017).

§ 77-3-45.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The commission shall prescribe, issue, amend and rescind such reasonable rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter. No rule or regulation shall be effective until thirty (30) days after a notice setting forth either the terms or substance thereof or a description of the subjects and issues involved and the time and place of a hearing thereon shall have been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the state. The commission shall file the notice with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law and mail a copy of it to all affected public utilities. The commission shall mail a copy of the proposed rule or regulation to any public utility that requests a copy. The hearing may be held at any time twenty (20) days after date of publication of the notice, but the rules or regulations shall not become effective until a hearing thereon. A proceeding to contest any rule or regulation due to noncompliance with the procedural requirements of this section must be commenced within one (1) year from the effective date of the rule or regulation. All rules and regulations of the commission shall be filed with its executive secretary and shall be readily available for public inspection and examination during reasonable business hours. Any interested person shall have the right to petition the commission for issuance, amendment or repeal of a rule or regulation.

The commission shall, in the exercise of its power to promulgate rules and regulations, adopt standard practices and procedures:

To specify what costs may be used for determining a public utility’s rate base, which balance the interests of consumers and investors;

To prescribe the time period for measuring a public utility’s rate base;

To specify allowable operating expenses, provided, however, that the commission shall exclude from a public utility’s allowable operating expenses any interest such utility paid, or credited, to its consumers in connection with refunds in a rate proceeding in which its rates were finally determined to be excessive;

To determine accurately the capital costs of a public utility;

To define specific costs which may be included by a public utility in its monthly fuel adjustment clause retail billings;

To define specific costs which may be included by a public utility distributing gas in its monthly purchased gas adjustments retail billings;

To prescribe minimal uniform standards of service for various classes of public utilities; and

To provide for any other rules and regulations deemed by the commission to be appropriate for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-13; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 13; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 21; Laws, 1993, ch. 420, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 77-3-46.
Management reviews of public utility companies.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the commission may, in its discretion, initiate a management review of any public utility company, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter and which has in excess of twenty-five thousand (25,000) customers, once every five (5) years, and at such other times deemed necessary by the commission as determined by it during a hearing, by a competent, qualified and independent firm, such review to examine thoroughly the efficiency and effectiveness of management decisions among other factors as directed by the commission. Such public utility shall render to the commission for such purpose books, records and other items prescribed by the commission. The cost of such review is to be borne by the particular public utility subject to the review; provided, however, that carriers subject to regulation by and auditing of the interstate commerce commission shall not be required to bear the expense of additional management review required hereunder.

Whenever the commission is of the opinion that it is in the public interest to do so, the commission may in its discretion initiate a management review of any other public utility company, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with the procedures set forth above in this section.

The commission shall not contract for such management review with any firm that has within three (3) years prior thereto performed a financial audit on behalf of such public utility nor on behalf of any affiliate, subsidiary, holding or parent company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch 467, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-47.
Hearings by commission.

The commission may, in addition to the hearings specifically provided for by this chapter, conduct such other hearings as may be deemed necessary in the administration of the powers and duties conferred upon it by this title.

The commission shall fix the time and place of hearings and shall serve notice thereof, not less than twenty (20) days before the time set for such hearings, unless the commission shall find that public convenience or necessity requires that such hearings be held at an earlier date. The commission may dismiss any complaint without a hearing if in its opinion a hearing is not necessary in the public interest or for the protection of substantial rights. Notice of all such hearings shall be given the persons interested therein by mailing such notice to each public utility which may be affected by any order resulting therefrom and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published in Jackson, Mississippi, and, in a proceeding for a facility certificate or an area certificate, by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties where the facility or area is located. In addition to any other notice requirements prescribed in this section, notice of a hearing regarding a major change in rates and schedules, as defined in Section 77-3-37(8), by a public utility of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iv) shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in an area where service is being provided by the public utility.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the commission, or the time to which the same may have been continued, the complainant and the person complained of shall be entitled in person or by attorney to be heard and to introduce evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-14; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 14; Laws, 1978, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 23; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 40; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 540, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 77-3-49.
Issuance of process by commission; witnesses.

The commission may issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum and all necessary process in proceedings pending before it. Such process shall extend to all parts of the state and may be served by any person authorized to serve process of courts of record. All process issued by the commission shall be signed by the chairman or secretary of the commission, and the seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto.

The commission and each of the commissioners, for the purpose mentioned in this article, may administer oaths, examine witnesses and certify official acts.

In case of failure on the part of any person or persons to comply with any lawful order of the commission, or with any subpoena or subpoenas duces tecum, or in the case of the refusal of any witness to testify concerning any matter on which he may be interrogated lawfully, any court of record of general jurisdiction or a judge thereof, may on application of the commission compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7716-15, 7716-16; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, §§ 15, 16.

§ 77-3-51.
Depositions by agreement.

Upon agreement of the parties in any proceeding, depositions of any witnesses may be taken and used in evidence pursuant to procedure for taking depositions which may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-17; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 17.